apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="/ये__vblex">
			<e> 		<p><l>येण</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><j/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>	

			<e> 		<p><l>ये</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>या</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येऊया</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>येऊयात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>यायला</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>येऊ</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येत</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येतो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येते</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येतो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येतोस</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येतेस</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येता</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येतो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येते</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येते</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येतात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			
			<e> 		<p><l>आलो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आले</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आलो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>आलास</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आला</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आलीस</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आली</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आलात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आला</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आले</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आल्यात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आलात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आल्या</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आला</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>आला</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आली</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आले</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आलं</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>आलेत</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आले</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>आल्या</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आल्यात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>आली</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>आलीत</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>येईन</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येऊ</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येशील</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येल</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येईल</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>येतील</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>येणार</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>येणार</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>येणार</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- habitual -->
			<e>			<p><l>यायचो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r='LR'>	<p><l>यायचा</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायची</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायचो</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायचे</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायच्या</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>यायचा</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>यायचास</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायची</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>यायचीस</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायचा</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>यायचात</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>यायचे</l><r>येणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

		<e lm="ये">  						<i></i><par n="/ये__vblex" /></e>
